District of Columbia statutes.
6-641.04

Zoning regulations — Vote required for amendment.

Any amendment of the regulations or any of them or of the maps or any of them shall require the favorable vote of not less than a full majority of the members of the Commission.

History

June 20, 1938, 52 Stat. 798, ch. 534, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-416.
1973 Ed., § 5-416.